California statutes. Education Code
 time than the third fiscal year beyond the fiscal year in which an application is made, except that an estimate for the purpose of justifying an apportionment for a grade level maintained by a unified district, under an application filed prior to September 15, 1961, or by a high school district composed of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, 9 to 12, inclusive, or 7 to 10, inclusive, or of justifying an apportionment for a unified district for a junior high school or high school project under an application made on or after the effective date shall not be made for a longer time than the fourth fiscal year beyond the fiscal year in which the application is made. Except as otherwise provided by the board, the estimates of average daily attendance shall be based upon the number of family dwellings and mobilehome parks, as defined in Section 18214 of the Health and Safety Code, under construction or newly constructed and never occupied in the district and the number of children residing in the district. In no case shall
 an estimate be given effect unless approved by the board.

For the purposes of this chapter pupils attending grades 7 and 8 in an elementary district but residing in a high school district which maintains one or more junior high schools shall not be considered in determining or estimating the average daily attendance of the elementary district, unless the elementary district is maintaining and has continuously maintained grades 7 and 8 since a date prior to January 1, 1959, or unless the electorate of the district, during the year 1974, has authorized the return of the seventh and eighth grade pupils from the high school district and the maintaining of grades 7 and 8 in the elementary district. When pupils attending grades 7 and 8 are so considered in determining or estimating the average daily attendance of the elementary district in making apportionment to the elementary district, these pupils shall not be considered in determining or estimating average daily
 attendance of the high school district in making an apportionment to the high school district for junior high school purposes.

The board shall develop statewide or areawide averages of pupil occupancy for family dwellings of various sizes and for mobilehomes of various sizes for use by applicant school districts in estimating the average daily attendance of family dwellings and mobilehome parks under construction or newly constructed and never occupied in the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16045.

(a) The board by the adoption of rules shall provide for the manner of determining the area of adequate school construction existing in an applicant school district at the time of application. The rules shall define and provide for the method of determining building areas that are to be included in whole or in part, or to be excluded from the area of existing adequate school construction.

The board may make exceptions to this section or to the rules adopted pursuant to this section when it determines
 that the exceptions will be for the benefit of children affected.

For the purposes of this section, “service area” may be defined as any of the following:

(b) (1) Buildings which when constructed were intended to be used for a purpose to which the provisions of Sections 17280 to 17313, inclusive, would not apply, whether or not those sections were in effect at the time when the building was constructed.

(2) Buildings which when constructed were intended to be used for a purpose to which Sections 17280 to 17313, inclusive, would apply, whether or not those sections were in effect when the building was constructed, but which building has been converted or is intended to be converted, as shown by the application, to use for purposes to which the sections would not apply. Service area may include, but is not limited to,
 construction used as bus garages, maintenance shops, centrally located district storage and warehouses, custodial houses, utility shelters, administration offices, transformer vaults, and service yards.

(c) In the event that a school district has expended funds for the purpose of constructing buildings used for housing certificated employees of the district and their families, the area of the buildings and the funds expended therefor shall be accounted for in the following manner:

(1) The area of the buildings constructed or acquired with the proceeds of a tax levied under Sections 14200 to 14240, 42200 to 42247, and 45020, inclusive, shall be excluded from the building area of the district.

(2) The area of the buildings constructed or acquired with the proceeds from the sale of school district bonds prior to July 1,
 1961, shall be excluded from the building area of the district, however, the bond funds shall not be considered as “eligible bonded debt service” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 16070 and Section 16084.

(d) The board shall exclude from the building area of a district:

(1) The area of any building which is or will be used exclusively for a parent cooperative nursery education facility, and for no other purpose, and which building at the time of acquisition thereof by the district was incidental to the purchase of a schoolsite and unsuitable for classroom purposes or which was acquired by the district without expenditure of school district funds.

(2) The area of any building which is or will be used exclusively for a preschool educational program facility pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 54400)
 of Part 29, or Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 16150) of Part 4 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or any combination thereof; provided, that the building was constructed, leased, or purchased with local general funds, or federal or state funds allocated specifically for a preschool educational program.

(e) The area of adequate school construction existing in a district at the time of application shall be initially computed as all of the construction area of a district except all of the following:

(1) The areas as may be eligible for replacement under standards established by the board.

(2) The areas in an existing structurally inadequate building for which an application has been filed for structural rehabilitation or in a building previously structurally rehabilitated under either Chapter 6
 (commencing with Section 15700) or Sections 16000 to 16207, inclusive, that exceeds the maximum building area allowed by Section 16044 for a number of pupils, equivalent to those that could be housed in the building after rehabilitation.

The board shall prescribe by rule the method of computing the number of pupils which could be so housed for the purposes of this subdivision.

(f) If the area of adequate school construction, when added to the minimum facilities needed by the district, results in a total construction area in excess of the amount prescribed in Section 16044, then the board may make the following adjustments to the initial computation or the revisions thereof as the board, in its discretion, deems desirable:

(1) Service areas constructed prior to July 19, 1947, shall be excluded, except as provided in paragraph (3).

(2) Service areas constructed subsequent to July 19, 1947, shall be recomputed by multiplying the total number of square feet of said service area by the percentage determined from dividing the actual construction cost per square foot as determined by the Director of General Services by the estimated average cost per square foot of the new school facilities for which the district has made application.

(3) If any inadequate nonservice area constructed prior to July 19, 1947, is, or will be, converted to a service area, the area shall be recomputed by multiplying said area by the percentage determined by dividing the depreciated value of said area by the replacement cost as the value and cost are determined by the Director of General Services.

(4) If, after the revised computation of service areas is made as prescribed
 under paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), the existing and requested building area of the district is in excess of the schedule set forth in Section 16044, the existing building area of nonservice facilities may be determined on the basis of the number of pupils housed by the facilities at an allowance per pupil which is not more than 25 percent in excess of the amount per pupil prescribed in Section 16044.

The board shall prescribe by rule the method for computing the number of adequately housed pupils for purposes of this subdivision.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16046.

Any building area excluded from the computation of adequate school building construction by adjustments made under Section 16045 shall not be subsequently included in computing the area of adequate school construction by reason of its having been converted to usable instructional area used exclusively for vocational educational programs, provided the conversion was accomplished with federal or district funds, allocated specifically for that purpose, other than state apportionment funds or bond funds required to be contributed to the State School Building Aid
 Program.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16047.

There shall be allowed to each district with attendance units of 300 or more in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, a maximum area of 55 square feet for each attendance unit of the district in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive.

The maximum total building area per attendance unit allowed to applicant districts with attendance units of less than 300 in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, for the attendance units shall be determined by the board, and shall be building area to provide comparable facilities
 to those provided by the first paragraph of this section, and shall be the least building area required to house adequately the estimated average daily attendance and the normal instructional and other services.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16048.

The area of any building constructed by a school district after September 11, 1957 with any funds other than state or federal funds given or bequeathed to the district after the effective date, and the area of any building given, devised or bequeathed to a school district by any entity other than the state or federal government after the effective date, including any building given to a district by any city, county or political subdivision of this state, shall not be included in any computation of the area of adequate school construction existing in any applicant
 school district under this chapter.

For the purposes of this section, any building leased to a school district for a term exceeding 24 years and for an annual rental of not exceeding five dollars ($5), shall be construed as constituting a gift to the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16049.

The area of any classroom or building used for adult education classes during the regular schoolday, except a building area that has been constructed or acquired with the proceeds from the sale of school district bonds or state or federal funds allocated to the district under any state school building aid program, shall not be included in any computation of the area of adequate school construction existing in any applicant school district under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16050.

The area of any building, the construction of which was financed by the proceeds from a tax levied pursuant to former Section 16633, shall not be included in any computation of the area of adequate school construction existing in any applicant school district under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16051.

The area of any building which has not been constructed or reconstructed under the provisions of Sections 17280 to 17313, inclusive, shall not be included in any computation of the area of adequate school construction under this chapter, provided that such area is being used exclusively for adult education classes during the regular schoolday and that the operation of such classes has been approved by the State Department of Education.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16051.5.

The area of any building, the construction of which was financed by the proceeds of a tax levied pursuant to Section 49502, shall not be included in any computation of the area of adequate school construction existing in any applicant school district under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16052.

There shall be allowed to each district a maximum area of 75 square feet for each attendance unit of the district in grades 7 and 8.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16053.

The allowance of maximum area to a district for the attendance units in junior high schools of the district composed of grades 7 to 9, inclusive, or 7 to 10, inclusive, shall be determined pursuant to this section, rather than Sections 16052 and 16054. This section does not apply to junior high schools composed of grades 7 and 8 only.

There shall be allowed to each district a maximum area for the attendance units of the district in junior high schools determined by computing, in accordance with the following paragraph, the
 number of square feet for the attendance units at each junior high school attendance center of the district, and totaling the number of square feet so determined for all attendance units in all such junior high school attendance centers of the district.

There shall be allowed a maximum area of 75 square feet for each attendance unit of the junior high attendance center in grades 7 and 8. For each attendance unit in grade 9, or grades 9 and 10, as the case may be, at each junior high school attendance center, there shall be allowed a maximum area of a number of square feet equal to the number of square feet which would be allowed under Section 16054 for each attendance unit of an attendance center having a total number of attendance units equal to the total number of attendance units in grades 7 to 9, inclusive, or 7 to 10, inclusive, as the case may be, at the junior high school attendance center. The number of square feet which would be allowed under Section 16054
 for each attendance unit of an attendance center shall be computed by determining in accordance with that section the total number of square feet which would be allowed at an attendance center and dividing such total number of square feet by the total number of attendance units at such attendance center.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16054.

There shall be allowed to each district a maximum area for the attendance units of the district in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, determined by computing, for the attendance units in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, at each attendance center of the district, a number of square feet for the number of attendance units in such grades at each attendance center, in accordance with the following table, and totaling the number of square feet so determined for all attendance units in such grades of all attendance centers of the district: Attendance units of attendance 
centerMaximum number of square feet
 of building area 1-50 18,000 51-100 18,000plus 162 for each attendance 
unit over 50101-200 26,100plus 99 for each attendance 
unit over 100201-300 36,000plus 60 for each attendance 
unit over 200301-600 42,000plus 54 for each attendance 
unit over 300601-1,800 58,200plus 80 for each attendance
 
unit over 600Over 1,800 154,200plus 85 for each attendance 
unit over 1,800

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16056.

When a unified district which is otherwise qualified for an apportionment under this chapter applies for an apportionment and the area of adequate school construction existing in any one of the component elementary districts included in the unified district is of such an amount that the district is prevented, by Sections 16044 to 16055 inclusive, from receiving an apportionment, the maximum area of school construction for each unit of attendance, for elementary school construction prescribed by such sections, may be computed separately for each component elementary
 district without regard to the area of adequate school construction existing in the other component districts, and apportionments made to the unified district on the basis of such separate computations. On request of the governing board of the unified district the State Superintendent of Public Instruction shall make or cause to be made a survey of building needs in the district and the area computations for elementary school construction. He or she shall report his or her findings and recommendations to the board for consideration in connection with any application before the board from the unified school district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16057.

Payment shall be made in accordance with the terms of a final apportionment, either directly or by way of reimbursement, to a school district for expenditures, or commitments therefor, which have been made by the district for any items approved by the board in the apportionment, provided, the construction contract has been let no earlier than two years preceding the date the application is received by the board. Where expenditures were made for, or work was commenced with respect to, any item so approved, prior to the time the application of such district containing
 such item was received by the board, payment or reimbursement for the item, either with state funds or with district funds which the district is required to contribute by the apportionment, shall be made only upon authorization of the board by special resolution citing this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16058.

No apportionment to a school district shall become final unless: (a) the total amount of outstanding bonds of the district exceeds 95 percent of the basic bond requirement of the district on the date the conditional apportionment is made, or (b) if the total amount of the bonds of the district outstanding and unpaid is within twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of the basic bond requirement of the district, as of the date on which the conditional apportionment is made, or (c) the district has issued and sold pursuant to this section, and as a condition to the
 initial conditional apportionment, an amount of bonds equal to the total cost of the project for which the apportionment was made, including necessary contingencies. At the time the board makes a conditional apportionment pursuant to Section 16024, it shall determine the total amount of bonds which shall be issued and sold by the district, the proceeds of which shall be applied toward the cost of the project for which the apportionment is sought. The amount so determined by the board shall be not less than the minimum amount required for the apportionment to become final under this section. Any apportionment made by the board pursuant to Section 16024 shall be conditioned upon the approval and sale of the bonds by the district. The amount of any apportionment for a construction project made as a consequence of applying district bond proceeds toward the reduction of prior apportionments pursuant to this section instead of applying the district bond proceeds toward the cost of the construction project, shall
 be excluded in determining the amount chargeable against the apportionments authorized by the electorate of the district to be accepted, expended and repaid. It is hereby declared that this provision, added by the amendment to this section enacted at the 1958 First Extraordinary Session of the Legislature, is not intended as a change in the law, but rather as a declaration of existing law.

Any provision of this code to the contrary notwithstanding, whenever the electors of a district, subsequent to any requirement by the board for the sale of bonds in connection with an apportionment, authorize the issuance of bonds for any purpose for which an apportionment could lawfully be made, the authorization shall, in addition to the purposes specified, be deemed to constitute the consent of the electors to apply the proceeds of the bonds so required to be sold by the board toward the reduction of any apportionment previously made to the district. Any bond funds used to
 reduce any apportionment pursuant to this section shall be transferred to the State School Building Aid Fund and shall be available for reapportionment by the board. The amount so determined by the board shall be not less than the minimum amount required for the apportionment to become final under this section. Any apportionment made by the board pursuant to Section 16024 shall be conditioned upon the approval and sale of the bonds by the district.

No apportionment to a school district under this chapter shall become final, nor any agreement authorized by Section 16042 be entered into unless at an election called by the governing board of the district, two-thirds of the qualified electors of the district voting thereat have authorized the governing board to accept, expend and repay as provided in this chapter and apportionment under the provisions thereof or, with respect to the agreement, to obligate the district in an amount equal to or in excess of the maximum
 amount which the district could be obligated by the agreement, or by any act of its governing board or for which it is responsible, contemplated or permitted thereby. The election shall be called, held and conducted in the same manner as are elections to authorize the issuance of school district bonds, except that the ballot shall contain substantially the following words:

“Shall the governing board of the district be authorized (1) to accept and expend an apportionment from the State of California under and subject to the provisions of Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 16000) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, which amount is subject to repayment as provided by said chapter, or (2) to enter into an agreement or agreements with the state pursuant to Section 16042 of the Education Code, which will at the time of such agreement or agreements (or at the time of any subsequent act of the governing board, or for which it is responsible,
 contemplated or permitted thereby) commit the district to a total expenditure in connection with all such agreements of not more than ____ dollars ($____), or both. Yes__ No__.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16059.

Notwithstanding any provision of Section 16058, if a previously eligible applicant school district has received apportionments and has realized savings in state aid apportionments or district contributions, or both, including any interest earned thereon, on completed projects pursuant to this chapter, which projects have not been reduced to final costs, the district may apply for, and shall be granted, final apportionments for additional eligible facilities in a total amount not to exceed those project savings.

The project
 savings for which a district has applied pursuant to this section shall not be considered excess apportionments or unencumbered balances for the purposes of Sections 16100 and 16104.

In no event shall the grant of the project savings to the district pursuant to this section extend the repayment period of any prior apportionments for the purposes of canceling the interest and principal payable thereon pursuant to Section 16083.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16060.

Notwithstanding any provisions of Section 16058, if an applicant district issues and sells bonds prior to an apportionment in an amount which results in its being on the date of the apportionment within five thousand dollars ($5,000) of the basic bond requirement of the district, and makes the entire proceeds of the bond issue available for the purposes of the apportionment, or as a condition of an apportionment is required by the board to sell bonds to within five thousand dollars ($5,000) of the basic bond requirement of the district, and to make the proceeds
 available for the purposes of Section 16058, the district shall remain qualified to receive an apportionment or apportionments prior to the next equalized assessment of the county or counties in which said district is located without being required to issue and sell additional bonds, notwithstanding the retirement of any bonds of the district or territorial changes therein subsequent to any apportionment referred to in this section and prior to the next equalized assessment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16061.

Immediately after the result of the election has been determined, the county superintendent of schools shall make a certificate in duplicate stating whether the bonds have been authorized in the amount prescribed by the board and whether the school district has authorized the acceptance and expenditure of the apportionment. One copy of the certificate shall be sent to the board and one copy to the Controller. When the bonds authorized have been issued and sold and the proceeds thereof made available for the purposes of the application, the county superintendent of
 schools shall also certify this fact to the board and the Controller. Upon the receipt by the board of the certificates stating that the bonds have been issued and sold and the proceeds made available for the purposes of the application, the apportionment shall become final.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16062.

The election by a school district upon the acceptance, expenditure, and repayment of an apportionment prescribed by Section 16058 may be called and held either before or after the making of an apportionment except that no election shall be held within 45 days before a statewide election or within 45 days after a statewide election unless conducted at the same time as that statewide election, subject to Part 3 (commencing with Section 10400) of Division 10 of the Elections Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16063.

Whenever a conditional apportionment has, prior to January 1, 1980, been made to an applicant school district pursuant to this chapter and thereafter the county superintendent of schools of the county having jurisdiction over the district has certified to the board and the Controller that at an election called, held and conducted in the district for that purpose, two-thirds of the qualified electors of the district voting thereat authorized the governing board of the applicant school district to accept, expend and repay an apportionment under this chapter, and
 whenever thereafter the county superintendent of schools has certified to the board and the Controller that the amount of bonds, if any, required by the board, as a condition to the apportionment becoming final, have been issued and sold and the proceeds thereof made available for the purposes of the application and the board has certified to the Controller that the apportionment to the applicant school district has become final, the final apportionment is hereby confirmed, ratified, and validated, and any expenditure of money from the State School Building Aid Fund according to the terms of the final apportionment is hereby confirmed, ratified, and validated.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, no funds authorized by any bond act for the purpose of this chapter shall be made available for expenditure without specific authority of the board or its delegated representative.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16064.

If the board has made an apportionment to a school district after November 1, 1960, upon the condition that the district issue and sell district bonds in an amount prescribed by the board, and an election was heretofore held in the district at which two-thirds of the voters voting on the proposition to authorize the issuance and sale of bonds in an amount sufficient to meet the condition of the apportionment voted in favor thereof, all acts or proceedings heretofore taken by or on behalf of the school district, under any law, or under the color of any law, for the
 authorization, issuance, sale or exchange of the bonds of the school district for any public purpose are hereby confirmed, validated and declared legally effective. This shall include all acts and proceedings of the governing board of the school district, and of any person or officer, heretofore done or taken upon the authorization, issuance, or sale of the bonds.

All bonds of any the school district heretofore authorized to be issued and hereafter issued and delivered in accordance with the authorization shall be the legal, valid and binding obligations of the district.

As used in this section the word “hereafter” means any time on or subsequent to the effective date of this section and the word “heretofore” means any time prior to the effective date.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16065.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary after June 28, 1955, at the time the board makes an apportionment, the board, with the approval of the Director of General Services, shall, pursuant to this section, fix the rate of interest to be paid by the district on the sum apportioned to it. The board shall compute the average of the rates of interest which the state pays upon the state school building bonds, authorized by Article XVI, sold at the three sales of state school building bonds occurring immediately prior to the apportionment, or, if the board so
 determines, at all of the sales of the bonds occurring in the two years immediately prior to the apportionment, giving effect to the price at which the state school building bonds sold at the sales, and the premium, if any paid, thereon. The average rate shall be adjusted to the next highest one-tenth of 1 percent to cover the cost of sale and issuance of the bonds and costs of administration. The adjusted average rate shall be the rate paid by the district on its apportionment, and shall be compounded annually through the 30th day of June of each year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16066.

Apportionments may be made irrespective of whether there is on deposit at the time thereof a sufficient amount in the State School Building Aid Fund to permit the payment of the apportionments. Disbursements may be made under any apportionment which heretofore or hereafter becomes final from any funds in the State School Building Aid Fund without regard to whether there exists at the time of the disbursement a sufficient amount in the fund to permit the payment in full of all apportionments previously made. However, no disbursements shall be made from any funds in
 the State School Building Aid Fund required by law to be transferred to the General Fund, or from any moneys therein which the Controller deems necessary to satisfy appropriations from the fund for purposes other than apportionments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16067.

No apportionment shall be made to a district for the construction, reconstruction, or alteration of, or addition to, school buildings if the requirements prescribed by this code for the construction of school buildings are not met by the plans for the entire building program of the district in connection with which the district applied for an apportionment or for any project or part thereof which has not been approved by the State Department of Education.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16068.

If any school district receives a final apportionment under this chapter and after November 12, 1952, receives money from the federal government as reimbursement for any expenditures by the state or school district for constructing any school facilities included in the construction project for which the district is receiving an apportionment, the amount of the district’s annual repayment next succeeding the date on which the district receives the money shall be increased by the amount of the money so received; provided, however, that the annual repayment of the
 district shall not be so increased where the money received from the federal government constitutes a contribution toward the cost of school facilities which are to be acquired, in part, with an apportionment, and the federal funds are encumbered or expended by the district in accordance with the purposes of the apportionment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16069.

Each district to which an apportionment has been made under this chapter shall repay the principal amount of the apportionment and the accrued interest thereon in the amount and in the manner provided in this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16070.

The following definitions apply to the computation and determinations required to be made under Section 16072, 16074, and 16075, and they apply with respect to each grade level of a district for which grade level an apportionment has become final during any preceding fiscal year.

(a) “Forty-cent tax amount” means the amount that would be produced by a tax of forty cents ($0.40) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation, to and including 1980–81 fiscal year. For the 1981–82 fiscal year and
 thereafter, the tax shall be 0.10 percent of the full valuation. This tax amount shall exclude the full value of solvent credits and other intangible property, for the current fiscal year within the district.

(b) “Thirty-cent tax amount” means the amount that would be produced by a tax of thirty cents ($0.30) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed valuation to and including the 1980–81 fiscal year. For the 1981–82 fiscal year and thereafter, the tax shall be 0.075 percent of the full valuation.

(c) “Ten-cent tax amount” means the amount that would be produced by a tax of ten cents ($0.10) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed valuation to and including the 1980–81 fiscal year. For the 1981–82 fiscal year and thereafter, the tax shall be 0.025 percent of the full value.

(d) “Eligible bonded
 debt service” means the amount raised and to be raised by the district during the current fiscal year for the repayment of principal and interest on the portion of the bonded indebtedness of the district that was incurred for each the grade level prior to the making of the first apportionment for grade level to the district under the provisions of this chapter computed as provided in Section 16072 plus the amount of the annual repayment under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 15700) of this part, provided that for the purposes hereof the first apportionment made to a district for a grade level after all previous apportionments to the district for that grade level have been repaid in full, excluding apportionments made under Section 16039 and not combined with construction apportionments, shall be deemed to be the “first apportionment for the grade level.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16071.

This section applies only to a unified school district that filed an application on or after April 30, 1977, for an apportionment for a grade level consisting of kindergarten, if any, and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and the repayments required for apportionments made under those applications.

The following definitions apply to the computation and determinations required to be made under Sections 16072, 16074, and 16075, and they apply with respect to the grade level of a unified school district for which grade level an
 apportionment has become final during any preceding fiscal year:

(a) “Forty-cent tax amount” means the amount that would be produced by a tax of 0.20 percent of full valuation for the current fiscal year within the district.

(b) “Thirty-cent tax amount” means the amount that would be produced by a tax of 0.15 percent of full valuation for the current fiscal year within the district.

(c) “Ten-cent tax amount” means the amount that would be produced by a tax of 0.05 percent of full valuation for the current fiscal year within the district.

(d) “Eligible bonded debt service” means the amount raised and to be raised by the district during the current fiscal year for the repayment of principal and interest on the portion of the bonded indebtedness of the
 district that was incurred for each grade level prior to the making of the first apportionment for the grade level to the unified school district under this chapter computed as provided in Section 16072 plus the amount of the annual repayment under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 15700) of this part.
